src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-2E-khieaqzzted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ǩieʹzzted: # Verb 'pop/naksahtaa' - full paradigm
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Inf: ǩieʹzzted
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ǩieʹzztam
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ǩieʹzztak
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩieʹzzat
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ǩieʹzztep
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ǩieʹzzteʹped
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩieʹzzte 
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: ǩieʹzztet
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ǩieʹzzet
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ǩieʹzztem
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ǩieʹzztiǩ
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ǩieʹzzti
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ǩieʹzztim
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ǩieʹzztid
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩieʹzzte
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: ǩieʹzzteš
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ǩieʹzztam
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Sg1: ǩieʹzzteʹžem
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Sg2: ǩieʹzzteʹžiǩ
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Sg3: ǩieʹzztež
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Pl1: ǩieʹzzteʹžep
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Pl2: ǩieʹzzteʹžid
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Pl3: ǩieʹzzteʹže
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+Sg4: ǩieʹzzteʹžet
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pot+ConNeg: ǩieʹzzteʹže
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Sg1: ǩieʹzzteʹčem
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Sg2: ǩieʹzzteʹčiǩ
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Sg3: ǩieʹzzteʹči
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Pl1: ǩieʹzzteʹčim
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Pl2: ǩieʹzzteʹčid
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Pl3: ǩieʹzzteʹče
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+Sg4: ǩieʹzzteʹčeš
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Cond+ConNeg: ǩieʹzzteʹče
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩieʹzzet
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩieʹzztââǥǥas
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+Pl1: ǩieʹzztâkap
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+Pl2: ǩieʹzzteʹǩed
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+Pl3: ǩieʹzztâkaz
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩieʹzztuku
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Actio+Ess: ǩieʹzzteʹmmen
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Actio: ǩieʹzztem
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Act+PrsPrc: ǩieʹzzteei
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Act+PrfPrc: ǩieʹzztam
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: ǩieʹzztum
     ǩieʹzzted+V+VAbess: ǩieʹzzteǩâni
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ger+Ess: ǩieʹzzteen
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Ger+Instr: ǩieʹzzteeʹl
     ǩieʹzzted+V+Der/musj+N+Sg+Nom: ǩieʹzztummuš
